Utah statutes.
17-22-5.5.   Sheriff's classification of jail facilities -- Maximum operating capacity of jail facilities -- Transfer or release of prisoners -- Limitation.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), a county sheriff shall determine:

(i)  subject to Subsection (1)(b), the classification of each jail facility or section of a jail facility under the sheriff's control;

(ii)  the nature of each program conducted at a jail facility under the sheriff's control; and

(iii)  the internal operation of a jail facility under the sheriff's control.

(b)  A classification under Subsection (1)(a)(i) of a jail facility may not violate any applicable zoning ordinance or conditional use permit of the county or municipality.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), each county sheriff shall:

(a)  with the approval of the county legislative body, establish a maximum operating capacity for each jail facility under the sheriff's control, based on facility design and staffing; and

(b)  upon a jail facility reaching its maximum operating capacity:

(i)  transfer prisoners to another appropriate facility:

(A)  under the sheriff's control; or

(B)  available to the sheriff by contract;

(ii)  release prisoners:

(A)  to a supervised release program, according to release criteria established by the sheriff; or

(B)  to another alternative incarceration program developed by the sheriff; or

(iii)  admit prisoners in accordance with law and a uniform admissions policy imposed equally upon all entities using the county jail.

(3)   This section may not be construed to authorize a sheriff to modify provisions of a contract with the Department of Corrections to house in a county jail persons sentenced to the Department of Corrections.

